Massachusetts, session 194th, H2442.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 244 the following section:-
Section 245. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Smoke evacuation system”, smoke evacuators, laser plume evacuators, or local exhaust
ventilators that effectively capture and neutralize surgical smoke at the site of origin and before
the smoke can make ocular contact or contact with the respiratory tract of the occupants of the
room.
“Surgical smoke”, the by-product, including surgical plume, smoke plume, bio-aerosols,
laser-generated airborne contaminants, and other lung-damaging dust, that results from contact
with tissue by an energy generating device.
of 2

(b) All hospitals and freestanding ambulatory surgical facilities licensed in the
commonwealth under this chapter shall adopt policies to ensure the elimination of surgical
smoke by use of a smoke evacuation system for any procedure that generates surgical smoke
from the use of energy-based devices including, but not limited to, electrosurgery and lasers.
(c) Any hospital or freestanding ambulatory surgical facility that violates subsection (b)
shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500 for each violation.
SECTION 2. (a) Section 245 of chapter 111 of the General Laws shall take effect as of
January 1, 2026.
(b) Every hospital and freestanding ambulatory surgical center shall report to the
department of public health by April 1, 2026 regarding the policies they have adopted to comply
with said section 245 of said chapter 111.
of 2